Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 12 Fair Trade Act [Repealed.]

6-12-1 — 6-12-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2427, §§ 1-7; P.L. 1938, ch. 2607, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 393, §§ 1-7; P.L. 1940, ch. 864, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1227, § 1; G.L., ch. 393, § 5; P.L. 1942, ch. 1227, § 2; G.L. 1956, §§

6-12-1

— 6-12-8; Repealed by P.L. 1970, ch. 79, § 1.